Hawaii, session 2025, SB399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the threat posed by climate change is of serious concern to the State and the world.  Proactive measures are needed to combat rising record temperatures and more frequent incidences of extreme weather.  According to the Emissions Database for Global Atmospheric Research, more than thirty billion tons of carbon dioxide has been released into the atmosphere every year since 2005.  While the State has set the goal to reach one hundred per cent renewable energy use by 2045, the State must take additional climate action beyond the adoption of renewable energy. The legislature further finds that, in addition to reducing carbon emissions through the use of renewable energy, the State must utilize carbon offsetting strategies and technologies.  According to the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, limiting global warming to 1.5 degrees Celsius will be impossible without the use of carbon capture technologies.  Currently, the most common method of carbon offsetting is the planting of trees. Alternatively, carbon capture plants require substantially less land to remove an equivalent amount of carbon dioxide. Advances in technology now allow for carbon to be scrubbed from the atmosphere with a combination of high-powered fans and filters and to be stored underground.  In 2021, a carbon capture plant using that technology began operation in Iceland, removing four thousand tons of carbon dioxide from the atmosphere each year.  Another Icelandic plant opened in 2024, which can capture thirty-six thousand tons of atmospheric carbon dioxide annually.  Future advances in carbon capture technology will likely expand those capabilities significantly.  The legislature also finds that the United States Department of Energy has announced funding for carbon capture technologies, and this Act may assist the State in obtaining federal funds. The legislature further finds that the threat to the State posed by climate change and the utilization of carbon offsetting strategies and technologies to limit global warming are matters of statewide concern that fall under the legislature's purview pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to direct the Hawaii state energy office to conduct a feasibility study for the construction of an atmospheric carbon capture plant in the State. SECTION 2. (a)  The Hawaii state energy office, in conjunction with the Hawaii nuclear energy institute, shall conduct a feasibility study for the construction of an atmospheric carbon capture plant in the State. (b) The study shall include but not be limited to the type of construction, proposed location, estimated costs, staffing requirements, and the estimated annual carbon dioxide capture rate of potential atmospheric carbon capture plants. (c) The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than forty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________